Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 11. Alaska Safety Advisory Council.

Sec. 18.60.830.
Alaska Safety Advisory Council.

There is established in the Department of Labor and Workforce Development the Alaska Safety Advisory Council.

The council consists of 13 members appointed by the governor as follows:

five members representing industry selected on the basis of geographic representation and population distribution;

four members representing labor selected on the basis of geographic representation and population distribution;

one member representing the federal government;

one member representing the state government;

one member representing local government; and

one member of the public.

A member of the council serves for a term of two years and until a successor is appointed and qualified. An appointment to a vacancy is for the unexpired term. A person may be reappointed by the governor for additional terms. A member of the council serves at the pleasure of the governor.

A member of the council serves without compensation but is entitled to travel and per diem expenses as provided in AS

39.20.180

.

The council shall elect a chairperson and a secretary from among its members, each to serve for a term not to exceed two years. The commissioner of labor and workforce development or the designee of the commissioner of labor and workforce development shall serve as the executive secretary of the council.

History.

(§ 1 ch 90 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in this section, “commissioner of labor” was changed to “commissioner of labor and workforce development” and “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Sec. 18.60.835.
Duties of the council.

The Alaska Safety Advisory Council shall

work in cooperation with official and unofficial organizations and instrumentalities in the state that are interested in promotion of safety so that possible resources can be marshalled and used to reduce the menace of accidental death and injury;

coordinate with and make recommendations to

the Department of Labor and Workforce Development;

the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities;

the Department of Public Safety;

the Department of Education and Early Development;

the Department of Natural Resources;

the Department of Health and Social Services; and

heads or representatives of federal departments and agencies operating in the state that are particularly concerned with safety programs and accident prevention;

make recommendations to the governor and the legislature on the achievement of a coordinated state policy and program for the safety and health of residents of the state;

organize and hold an annual governor’s safety conference to bring together citizens interested in safety and health matters.

History.

(§ 1 ch 90 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in this section “Department of Education” was changed to “Department of Education and Early Development” in accordance with § 89, ch. 58, SLA 1999, and “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Program receipts generated through private donations to the council and from fees charged to attend the annual governor’s safety conference must be remitted to the Department of Labor for deposit with the Department of Revenue. Use of a savings account to deposit program receipts is contrary to state law. (Opinion issued before enactment of AS

18.60.840

.) January 4, 1991 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 18.60.840.
Finances of the council.

The Alaska Safety Advisory Council may charge a fee for attendance at the annual governor’s safety conference, based on the estimated cost to organize and hold the conference.

The receipt and expenditure by the council of money from any source is subject to AS 37.07 (Executive Budget Act).

History.

(§ 1 ch 30 SLA 1991)

Legislative history reports. —

For the governor’s transmittal letter concerning the enactment of this section by § 1, ch. 30, SLA 1991 (SB 190), see 1991 Senate Journal 503.